Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1054.
do enact as follows:SB1054,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1054,2,113(1) Medical Assistance coordination working group. As soon as 1practicable and by no later than June 1, 2026, or the first day of the 2nd month 2beginning after the effective date of this subsection, whichever occurs later, the 3department of health services shall convene a working group to address statewide 4coordination of the Medical Assistance program and improving Medical Assistance 5recipients’ experience with the Medical Assistance program in light of the changes 6to the Medical Assistance program under P.L. 119-21. By no later than the first day 7of the 7th month after the working group first convenes, the working group shall 8submit to the department of health services and the appropriate standing 9committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) a report on its findings and 10recommendations. The working group shall consist of any person the department 11of health services deems necessary and at least one of each of the following:SB1054,2,1212(a) A representative of the department of health services.SB1054,2,1313(b) A representative of a resource center, as defined in s. 46.2805 (10).SB1054,2,1614(c) A representative of a multicounty consortium, as defined in s. 49.78 (1) 15(br), or a tribal governing body that administers income maintenance programs, as 16defined in s. 49.78 (1) (b).SB1054,2,1717(d) A member of the assembly or senate.SB1054,2,1818(e) A health care provider.SB1054,2,1919(f) A Medical Assistance recipient.SB1054,2,2020